New York, session 2025-2026, S6126.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3602-e of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 21 to read as follows: 3 21. School districts shall utilize the totality of their allotted 4 funds from the amount set forth for such school districts as "UNIVERSAL 5 PREKINDERGARTEN" in the school aid computer listing produced by the 6 commissioner in support of the enacted budget for such year. School 7 districts shall be exempt from this requirement if they demonstrate that 8 program utilization rates fall short of allocated slots due to insuffi- 9 cient demand for state-funded slots. The board of regents and the 10 commissioner shall be authorized to adopt regulations to implement the 11 provisions of this subdivision. Any school district which fails to 12 comply with this subdivision during any school year shall be subject to 13 the requirements of subdivision five of section twenty-one hundred two-a 14 of this chapter. If the reason for lack of utilization is due to insuf- 15 ficient classroom space, then the school district shall also set forth a 16 plan to address the insufficient space. 17 § 2. Section 3602-ee of the education law is amended by adding a new 18 subdivision 18 to read as follows: 19 18. Facilities providing universal full-day pre-kindergarten under 20 this section shall utilize the totality of awarded funds for such year. 21 Such facilities shall be exempt from this requirement if they demon- 22 strate that program utilization rates fall short of allocated slots due 23 to insufficient demand for state-funded slots. The board of regents and 24 the commissioner shall be authorized to adopt regulations to implement EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10561-01-5 S. 6126 2 1 the provisions of this subdivision. Any such facility which fails to 2 comply with this subdivision during any school year shall be subject to 3 the requirements of subdivision six of section twenty-one hundred two-a 4 of this chapter. If the reason for lack of utilization is due to insuf- 5 ficient classroom space, then the school district shall also set forth a 6 plan to address the insufficient space. 7 § 3. Section 2102-a of the education law is amended by adding two new 8 subdivisions 5 and 6 to read as follows: 9 5. (a) In every school year where a school district is in violation of 10 subdivision twenty-one of section thirty-six hundred two-e of this chap- 11 ter, every trustee or voting member of a board of education of such 12 school district, shall, by April first of the school year in which the 13 funds were underutilized, complete a minimum of twelve hours of training 14 on the importance of early childhood education, learning, and develop- 15 ment. Every trustee or voting member of such board of education shall 16 repeat this training for every year in which such school district is in 17 violation of subdivision twenty-one of section thirty-six hundred two-e 18 of this chapter. 19 (b) Each trustee or voting member of a board of education subject to 20 the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall demonstrate 21 compliance with the requirements of such paragraph by filing with the 22 district clerk a certificate of completion of such training. Actual and 23 necessary expenses incurred by a trustee or voting member of a board of 24 education in complying with the foregoing requirements shall be charged 25 against the school district. 26 (c) The commissioner shall develop early childhood education, learn- 27 ing, and development training materials for use by district officials 28 pursuant to this subdivision no later than three months after the effec- 29 tive date of this subdivision. The training required by this subdivision 30 may be offered by eligible agencies pursuant to section thirty-six 31 hundred two-e of this chapter. In approving other providers for these 32 trainings, the commissioner shall consider the potential provider's 33 understanding of the educational environment, the roles of trustees, 34 boards of education, and boards of cooperative educational services, and 35 the experience of the provider in delivering such training. 36 6. (a) In every school year where a facility providing universal full- 37 day pre-kindergarten under section thirty-six hundred two-ee of this 38 chapter is in violation of subdivision eighteen of section thirty-six 39 hundred two-ee of this chapter, every trustee, board member or other 40 similarly situated person of such facility, shall, by April first of the 41 school year in which the funds were underutilized, complete a minimum of 42 twelve hours of training on the importance of early childhood education, 43 learning, and development. Every such person shall repeat this training 44 for every year in which such school district is in violation of subdivi- 45 sion eighteen of section thirty-six hundred two-ee of this chapter. 46 (b) Each trustee, board member or other similarly situated person of 47 such facility subject to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 48 vision shall demonstrate compliance with the requirements of such para- 49 graph by filing with the district clerk a certificate of completion of 50 such training. Actual and necessary expenses incurred by such persons in 51 complying with the foregoing requirements shall be charged against the 52 facility. 53 (c) The commissioner shall develop early childhood education, learn- 54 ing, and development training materials for use by district officials 55 pursuant to this subdivision no later than three months after the effec- 56 tive date of this subdivision. The training required by this subdivision S. 6126 3 1 may be offered by eligible agencies pursuant to section thirty-six 2 hundred two-ee of this chapter. In approving other providers for these 3 trainings, the commissioner shall consider the potential provider's 4 understanding of the educational environment, the roles of trustees, 5 boards of education, and boards of cooperative educational services, and 6 the experience of the provider in delivering such training. 7 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 8 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 9 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 10 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 11 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.